Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.292

Posting of department of health information.

(1) Within existing resources, each school district that maintains a website must post a prominent link on their homepage, and the homepage for each school within the district, to information from the department of health provided in accordance with RCW 70.54.490 that addresses substance use trends, overdose symptoms and response, and the secure storage of prescription drugs, over-the-counter medications, and firearms and ammunition.

(2) Each school district, for the purpose of informing students, families, and other interested persons about available health and safety resources, must also make the information from the department of health accessible through other internet-based communications, such as social media accounts used by the district and through other digital and nondigital communications of the district. Postings required by this subsection may be made multiple times annually and no less frequently than twice each school year.

(3) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW.

[ 2023 c 173 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 173: See note following RCW 70.54.490.